Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Chapter 14

Artisans' Lien

66-14-101. Right to sell unclaimed articles left for repairs.

Silversmiths, lock and gunsmiths, blacksmiths, watchmakers and repairers, and artisans generally, who do work for the public, shall have the common law lien, and the right, at the expiration of six (6) months from the time of the contract and the leaving with them of the goods or products to be repaired, developed, processed or improved, if not claimed or called for by the owner, to sell the same at public outcry after complying with this chapter.

“Artisans” are further defined as including persons who make, clean, mend, repair, alter or otherwise perform work on shoes or boots, as well as persons with whom are left goods or products to be repaired, developed, processed, or improved.

The lien established by this section shall not apply to work performed on a “motor vehicle” as defined in § 55-12-102.

Acts 1935, ch. 53, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7984; Acts 1959, ch. 127, § 1; 1965, ch. 276, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1401; Acts 1998, ch. 760, § 1.

Cross-References. Lien for repairs to conveyances generally, §66-19-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 24.

Law Reviews.

An Introduction to the Proposed Bankruptcy Act of 1973: From Revision to Revolution (John A. Walker, Jr.), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 635 (1975).

66-14-102. Notice to persons interested.

The artisan shall give a written notice to the person for whose account the goods were repaired, and to any other person known to the artisan who claims an interest in the goods. This notice shall be given by delivery in person, or by registered mail addressed to the last known place of business or abode of the person to be notified.

Artisans, other than entities licensed and regulated pursuant to title 55, chapter 17, shall make reasonable inquiry to identify parties claiming an interest in the goods and shall give written notice to such parties as provided in subsection (a).

In the event the goods are motor vehicles or other goods requiring certificates of title pursuant to title 55, “reasonable inquiry” as required by subsection (b) shall be satisfied by an inquiry of the title and registration division of the department of revenue or a county clerk as agent for the division to determine the interest of all title owners and all lienholders.

Acts 1935, ch. 53, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7985; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1402; Acts 1997, ch. 73, §§ 2-4.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 7-503.

Law Reviews.

The Collection of Debts from Insolvent and Fully-Mortgaged Debtors (John A. Walker, Jr.), 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 399 (1976).

66-14-103. Contents of notice.

The notice shall contain:

An itemized statement of the artisan's claim and the date, or dates, when it became due;

A brief description of the goods against which the lien exists;

A demand that the amount of the claim as stated in the notice, and of such other claim as shall accrue, shall be paid on or before a date mentioned, not less than ten (10) days from the delivery of the notice, if it be personally delivered, or from the time when the notice should reach its destination, according to the due course of post, if the notice is sent by mail; and

A statement that unless the claim is paid within the time specified, the goods will be advertised for sale and sold by auction at a specified time and place.

Acts 1935, ch. 53, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7986; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1403.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 7-503, 7-504.

66-14-104. Advertisement and sale.

In accordance with the terms of the notice provided for in §66-14-102, a sale of the goods by auction may be had to satisfy the lien on the goods. The sale shall be had in the place where the lien was acquired, or, if such place is unsuitable for the purpose, at a convenient suitable place. After the time for the payment of the claim specified in the notice has elapsed, an advertisement of the sale describing the goods to be sold, and stating the name of the owner or person on whose account the goods are held, and the time and place of the sale, shall be published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks, in a newspaper published in the place where the sale is to be held. The sale shall not be held less than fifteen (15) days from the time of the first publication. If there is no newspaper published in the place where the sale is to be held, the advertisement shall be posted at least ten (10) days before the sale in not less than six (6) conspicuous places in the place.

Acts 1935, ch. 53, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7987; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1404.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 7-504.

66-14-105. Satisfaction of lien by owner.

At any time before the goods are sold, any person claiming a right of property or possession therein may pay the artisan the amount necessary to satisfy the lien and pay the reasonable expenses and liabilities incurred in serving notice and advertisement and preparing for the sale up to the time of such payment. The artisan shall deliver the goods to the person making such payment if that person is entitled, under this chapter, to the possession of the goods on payment of such expenses and liabilities.

Acts 1935, ch. 53, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7988; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1405.

66-14-106. Disposition of proceeds of sale.

If the goods are sold, from the proceeds of such sale the artisan shall satisfy such artisan's lien, including the reasonable charges of notice, advertisement, and sale. The balance, if any, of the proceeds shall be held by the artisan, and delivered on demand to the person to whom the artisan would have been bound to deliver or justified in delivering the goods. If no person claims the balance within twelve (12) months, the artisan shall turn over the balance to the trustee of the county for the benefit of the common schools of the county in which the goods were sold.

Acts 1935, ch. 53, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7988; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1406.

66-14-107. Alternate method of enforcement.

In addition to the method of enforcement of the artisans' lien provided in §§66-14-102 —66-14-106, inclusive, such lien may be enforced, in the alternative, by the artisan complying with §§66-16-107 and 66-16-108, relating to launderers', cleaners' and storage liens.

Acts 1959, ch. 127, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1407.

Compiler's Notes. Sections 66-16-102 — 66-16-106, referred to in this section, were repealed by Acts 1990, ch. 778, effective April 5, 1990. Section 66-16-107 was not repealed by that act.

Law Reviews.

The Collection of Debts from Insolvent and Fully-Mortgaged Debtors (John A. Walker, Jr.), 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 399 (1976).